Nebraska, session 109, LB1175.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1175 LB1175
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 86-1704, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
86-1704 (1) A person aggrieved by a violation of section 86-1703 may
bring a civil action against the social media company or third-party
vendor which engaged in the violation to recover such relief as may be
appropriate.
(2) In an action under this section, appropriate relief includes:
(a) Such preliminary and other equitable or declaratory relief as
may be appropriate;
(b) Damages under subsection (3) of this section; and
(c) At the discretion of the court, reasonable attorney's fees and
other litigation costs reasonably incurred.
(3)(a) An individual whose information was retained in violation of
subdivision (1)(b) of section 86-1703 may recover actual damages caused
by such violation.
(b) A minor or a parent of such minor aggrieved by any other
violation of section 86-1703 may recover actual damages, including, but
not limited to, damages for injury, self-harm, addiction, sexual
exploitation, or other harms to a minor caused by such violation.
(4) A social media platform shall be considered a product for
purposes of a civil action brought as a product liability action as
defined in section 25-21,180.
Sec. 2. Original section 86-1704, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, is repealed.
-2-